Utah statutes.
4-25-6.   Compensation for care of estrays -- Liability of county -- Notice
required.
(1) A person who finds an estray and who, after giving notice is authorized by
the county to maintain and care for it, is entitled to compensation from the
owner, or from the county, as the case may be, for the reasonable costs of
feeding and maintaining the animal; provided, that the county is liable for
such cost only if the owner is not located after diligent search.
(2)  No person who finds an estray however, is entitled to reimbursement for
feed and maintenance or for any other cost incurred on behalf of the estray
before such time as notice of the estray is given to the county or to the
appropriate animal control office.
